Utah, session 2026, HB359.
Section 1. Section 26B-1-337 is enacted to read:26B-1-337. Preceptor Fund.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Health care provider" means:(i)a physician licensed under Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, or Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act;(ii)a physician assistant licensed under Title 58, Chapter 70a, Utah Physician Assistant Act; or(iii)an advanced practice registered nurse licensed under Subsection 58-31b-301(2)(e).(b)"Preceptorship" means clinical education where a health care provider provides direct supervision, instruction, and evaluation to a student.(2)There is created an expendable special revenue fund known as the "Preceptor Fund."(3)The fund shall consist of: (a)gifts, grants, donations, or any other conveyance of money that may be made to the fund from private sources; and(b)additional amounts as appropriated by the Legislature.(4)The department shall use money in the fund to pay a health care provider that is providing a preceptorship:(a)to a student enrolled in a Utah-based medical school, advance practice registered nurse program, or physician assistant program; and(b)that is a minimum of 160 hours in duration, including direct instruction, training, and supervision.(5)A health care provider may combine hours across multiple students to meet the 160-hour minimum described in Subsection (4)(b).(6)In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the department shall make rules regarding:(a)the application process for receiving funds;(b)how the department will prioritize disbursing funds;(c)criteria a health care provider must meet to receive funds;(d)the manner and intervals payments will be made; and(e)any other issue necessary for the department to efficiently and effectively facilitate preceptorships for students in the state.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 58-1-313 is enacted to read:58-1-313. Health care provider donation to Preceptor Fund.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Fund" means the Preceptor Fund created in Section 26B-1-337.(b)"Health care provider" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-1-337.(2)As part of the license application or application renewal process for a health care provider, the division shall allow an applicant to donate money to the fund.(3)The division shall transfer the amount donated under Subsection (2) to the fund.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.